Utah statutes.
48-2c-1612 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Grounds for revocation.

The division may commence a proceeding under Section 48-2c-1613 to revoke the authority of a foreign company to transact business in this state if:

(1)  the foreign company does not deliver its annual report to the division when it is due;

(2)  the foreign company does not pay when they are due any taxes, fees, or penalties imposed by this chapter or other applicable laws of this state;

(3)  the foreign company is without a registered agent in this state;

(4)  the foreign company does not inform the division under Title 16, Chapter 17, Model Registered Agents Act, that its registered agent has changed or that its registered agent has resigned;

(5)  an organizer, member, manager, or agent of the foreign company signs a document knowing it is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the division for filing; or

(6)  the division receives a duly authenticated certificate from the lieutenant governor or other official having custody of limited liability company records in the state or country under whose law the foreign company is formed or organized stating that the foreign company has dissolved or disappeared as the result of a merger.

